apertium-fr-pt.pt.dix
    <pardef n="constr/uir__vblex">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uiríamos</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uiria</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uiríeis</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uirias</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uiriam</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uiria</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uiremos</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uirei</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uireis</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uirás</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uirão</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uirá</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uirmos</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uirmo</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uirmos</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uir</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uir</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uí</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uirdes</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uirde</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uirdes</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uíres</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uíre</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uíres</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uírem</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uírem</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uir</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uir</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uí</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uindo</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uindo</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uímos</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uímo</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uímos</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uí</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uí</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uístes</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uíste</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uístes</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uíste</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uíste</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uíram</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uíram</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantam"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uiu</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uiu</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__canta"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uamos</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uamo</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantá"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uamos</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantemos"/>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uam</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uam</l>
          <r>uir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__cantaste"/>
      </e>

      <e lm="construir">
        <i>constr</i>
        <par n="constr/uir__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e lm="destruir">
        <i>destr</i>
        <par n="constr/uir__vblex"/>
      </e>
